Hawaii statutes.
§436E-3.5 Physicians and osteopaths not
exempt. Persons licensed under chapter 453 who desire to practice
acupuncture shall be subject to licensing under this chapter. [L 1989, c 180,
§2; am L 1993, c 260, §1; am L 2009, c 11, §57]

Attorney General Opinions

Medical acupuncture is not sufficiently distinct from
traditional acupuncture so as to fall outside the scope of the practice of
acupuncture. Physicians licensed by board of medical examiners cannot practice
medical acupuncture absent licensure by board of acupuncture. Att. Gen. Op.
03-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next